West Virginia, session 2026, HB5438.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9A. PUBLIC SCHOOL SUPPORT. §18-9A-10. Foundation allowance to improve instructional programs, instructional technology, and teacher and leader induction and professional growth. (a) The total allowance to improve instructional programs and instructional technology is the sum of the following:(1) For instructional improvement, in accordance with county and school electronic strategic improvement plans required by §18-2E-5 of this code, an amount equal to 10 percent of the increase in the local share amount for the next school year shall be added to the amount of the appropriation for this purpose for the immediately preceding school year. The sum of these amounts shall be allocated to the counties as follows:(A) One hundred fifty thousand dollars shall be allocated to each county; and(B) Allocation to the counties of the remainder of these funds shall be made proportional to the average of each county's average daily attendance for the preceding year and the county's second month net enrollment;(C) Moneys allocated by this subdivision shall be used to improve instructional programs according to the county and school strategic improvement plans required by §18-2E-5 of this code and approved by the state board; (D) The funds available for personnel under this subdivision may not be used to increase the total number of professional noninstructional personnel in the central office beyond four; (E) The plan shall be made available for distribution to the public at the office of each affected county board; plus(2) For the purposes of improving instructional technology, an amount equal to 20 percent of the increase in the local share amount for the next school year shall be added to the amount of the appropriation for this purpose for the immediately preceding school year. The sum of these amounts shall be allocated to the counties as follows:(A) Thirty thousand dollars shall be allocated to each county; and(B) Allocation to the counties of the remainder of these funds shall be made proportional to the average of each county's average daily attendance for the preceding year and the county's second month net enrollment;(C) Moneys allocated by this subdivision shall be used to improve instructional technology programs according to the county board's strategic technology learning plan; (D) This allocation for the improvement of instructional technology programs may also be used for the employment of technology system specialists essential for the technology systems of the schools of the county to be fully functional and readily available when needed by classroom teachers. The amount of this allocation used for the employment of technology system specialists shall be included and justified in the county board’s strategic technology learning plan; (E) The total appropriation computed under the preceding allocation structure shall be reduced annually by an amount not to exceed $15 million to be retained by the Department of Education to implement and fund annually a replacement uniform budgeting and accounting system pursuant to Department requirements outlined in §18-9B-5 and §18-9B-9 of this code, respectively; plus(3) One percent of the state average per pupil state aid multiplied by the number of students enrolled in dual credit, advanced placement, and international baccalaureate courses, as defined by the state board, distributed to the counties proportionate to enrollment in these courses in each county; plus(4) For the purpose of supporting county-level implementation of the comprehensive systems for teacher and leader induction and professional growth pursuant to §18A-3C-3 of this code, an amount equal to 20 percent of the increase in the local share amount for the next school year shall be added to the amount of the appropriation for this purpose for the immediately preceding school year. The sum of these amounts shall be allocated to the counties in a manner established by the state board which considers the following factors:(A) The number of full-time-equivalent teachers employed by the county with zero years of experience; (B) The number of full-time-equivalent teachers employed by the county who are less than fully certified for the teaching position in which they are employed;(C) The total number of full-time-equivalent teachers employed by the county with one year of experience, with two years of experience, and with three years of experience;(D) The number of full-time-equivalent principals, assistant principals, and vocational administrators employed by the county who are in their first or second year of employment as a principal, assistant principal, or vocational administrator;(E) The number of full-time-equivalent principals, assistant principals, and vocational administrators employed by the county who are in their first year in an assignment at a school with a programmatic level in which they have not previously served as a principal, assistant principal, or vocational administrator;(F) Needs identified in the strategic plans for continuous improvement of schools and school systems including those identified through the performance evaluations of professional personnel;(G) Notwithstanding any provision of this subsection to the contrary, no county may receive an allocation for the purposes of this subdivision which is less than the county’s total 2016-2017 allocation from the Teacher Mentor and Principals Mentorship appropriations to the Department of Education. Moneys allocated by this subdivision shall be used for implementation of the comprehensive systems for teacher and leader induction and professional growth pursuant to §18A-3C-3 of this code. (H) The Department of Education may retain an amount of funds to be allocated under this subdivision beginning with the school year 2024 – 2025, not exceeding $15,000,000, to accommodate the participation by county school systems in regional professional learning cadres or teacher leadership networks established or supported by the Department of Education, to expand regional professional learning cadres or teacher leadership networks designed to support the full implementation of the Third Grade Success Act provided in §18-2E-10 of this code, to implement the Department of Education's academic initiatives to provide and promote training in the science of reading as defined in 18-2E-10(c) of this code for kindergarten through fifth grade classroom teachers, and to assist teachers who are less than fully certified for the teaching position in which they are employed as further provided in §18A-3C-3 of this code. The Governor shall also provide in each budget for the reappropriation for expenditure during the ensuing fiscal year the unused accumulated balance remaining with the Department of Education to continue these initiatives including training in the science of reading as defined in §18-2E-10(c) of this code for kindergarten through fifth grade classroom teachers. Up to $1,000,000 of the $15,000,000 shall be distributed to county boards for the purpose of expanding the school districts’ ability to contract with organizations that facilitate the school districts’ participation in regional professional learning cadres or teacher leadership networks designed to support math and science improvement or to support teachers who are less than fully certified for the teaching position in which they are employed as further provided in §18A-3C-3 of this code. The $1,000,000 shall be distributed to the county boards under a grant program to be established by the state board by rule pursuant to §29A-3B-1 et seq. of this code. The rule shall include at least the following:(A) A requirement and procedures for county boards to submit applications for a grant;(B) Criteria on which awards of the grants will be based on; and(C) A requirement for an external evaluation for any program funded by a grant. The Clerk of the House of Delegates and the Clerk of the Senate hereby certify that the foregoing bill is correctly enrolled.  ............................................................... Clerk of the House of Delegates  		............................................................... Clerk of the Senate				                  Originated in the House of Delegates. In effect July 1, 2026.    				............................................................... Speaker of the House of Delegates  						............................................................... President of the Senate  __________   	The within is ................................................ this the........................................... Day of ..........................................................................................................., 2026.  				.............................................................								Governor Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home